Massachusetts, session 194th, H737.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting the following section: -
Section 1E.
(a) No public school shall require any student athlete on a single-sex sports team to
participate in a match, or any part thereof, against an opposing team that includes one or more
athletes of the opposite sex. No penalty, including but not limited to loss of playing time or loss
of
starting status, shall be imposed by a public school on such a student athlete for refusing
to play in such a match.
of 2

(b) No coach of a single-sex public school sports team shall be penalized by that
school for forfeiting a match against an opposing team because such opposing team includes one
or more athletes of the opposite sex.
(c) The Department of Elementary and Secondary Education, the Massachusetts
Interscholastic Athletic Association, or any equivalent school organization or an entity or board
that provides athletic officials, including, but not limited to, referees and umpires, for school
sports or athletic events shall not penalize any public school, single-sex public school sports
team, coach of such a team, or student athlete on such a team, for forfeiting or refusing to play in
a match against an opposing team because such opposing team includes one or more athletes of
the opposite sex, except that such a forfeit may be recorded as a loss.
of 2